Arkansas, session 2025, HB1168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 2, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 7 — Immunity

5-2-701. Healthcare professional criminal immunity — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Healthcare facility” means an institution, building,
agency, or a portion of an institution, building, or agency that is used,
operated, or designed to provide healthcare services, medical treatment,
nursing care, rehabilitative care, or preventative care to an individual,
regardless of whether the institution, building, or agency is a private
organization, a public organization, a nonprofit organization, or a for-
profit organization.
(B) “Healthcare facility” includes without limitation:
(i) A hospital;
(ii) A psychiatric hospital;
*JMB045*
01/16/2025 1:19:06 PM JMB045

HB1168
(iii) A physical rehabilitation hospital;
(iv) A chemical dependency program;
(v) A nursing facility or nursing home;
(vi) A personal care home;
(vii) An intermediate care facility;
(viii) An assisted living facility;
(ix) A family care home;
(x) An outpatient clinic;
(xi) An ambulatory surgical facility;
(xii) An ambulance provider;
(xiii) A hospice;
(xiv) A community mental health center;
(xv) A home health agency;
(xvii) A kidney disease treatment center or
freestanding hemodialysis unit; and
(xvii) A facility providing similarly organized
healthcare services regardless of nomenclature;
(2) "Healthcare professional" means:
(A) An employee of a healthcare facility; or
(B) A person who is licensed, certified, or otherwise
authorized by the laws of this state to administer health care in the
ordinary course of the practice of his or her profession; and
(3) "Healthcare service" means clinically related services
provided within this state to a person, including without limitation
diagnostic, treatment, or rehabilitative services and alcohol, drug abuse,
and mental health services.
(b) A healthcare professional who is providing a healthcare service
and is otherwise lawfully acting is immune from criminal liability for any
harm or damages to the person receiving the healthcare service alleged to
arise from a negligent act or omission related to providing the healthcare
service.
(c) This section does not amend, repeal, or alter any other immunity,
defense, limitation of liability, or procedure available or required under
any other law or contract.


01/16/2025 1:19:06 PM JMB045